Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-682.01
Speed limit violations; fines.

(1) Any person who operates a vehicle in violation of any maximum speed limit established for any highway or freeway is guilty of a traffic infraction.

(2) Upon conviction for a violation of this section, a person shall be fined:

(a) Fifty dollars for traveling one to five miles per hour over the authorized speed limit;

(b) Seventy-five dollars for traveling over five miles per hour but not over ten miles per hour over the authorized speed limit;

(c) One hundred twenty-five dollars for traveling over ten miles per hour but not over fifteen miles per hour over the authorized speed limit;

(d) Two hundred dollars for traveling over fifteen miles per hour but not over twenty miles per hour over the authorized speed limit;

(e) Three hundred dollars for traveling over twenty miles per hour but not over thirty-five miles per hour over the authorized speed limit; and

(f) Four hundred dollars for traveling over thirty-five miles per hour over the authorized speed limit.

(3) The fines prescribed in subsection (2) of this section shall be doubled if the violation occurs within a maintenance, repair, or construction zone established pursuant to section 60-6,188. For purposes of this subsection, maintenance, repair, or construction zone means (a)(i) the portion of a highway identified by posted or moving signs as being under maintenance, repair, or construction or (ii) the portion of a highway identified by maintenance, repair, or construction zone speed limit signs displayed pursuant to section 60-6,188 and (b) within such portion of a highway where road construction workers are present. The maintenance, repair, or construction zone starts at the location of the first sign identifying the maintenance, repair, or construction zone and continues until a posted or moving sign indicates that the maintenance, repair, or construction zone has ended.

(4) The fines prescribed in subsection (2) of this section shall be doubled if the violation occurs within a school crossing zone as defined in section 60-658.01.

Laws 1996, LB 901, § 11;

Laws 1997, LB 91, § 4;

Laws 2008, LB621, § 2;

Laws 2009, LB111, § 1;

Laws 2025, LB530, § 26.